Utah statutes.
35A-5-103.   Roles of service providers.

(1)  Delivery of job training related services not administered by the department under this chapter shall be provided in accordance with Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  The State Office of Education and the Board of Regents shall provide for basic education, remedial education, and applied technology training.

(3)  The Office of Rehabilitation shall provide those services authorized under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended.

